District of Columbia statutes.
1-905.01

Replacement program for covered District employees.

The replacement plan governing retirement and disability for service and benefits accrued after June 30, 1997, for covered District employees shall be the retirement program in effect for covered District employees as of June 30, 1997.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 121, 45 DCR 4045

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-905.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-783.1.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.